Alabama, session 2026rs, HB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Act 2024-344, Regular Session 2024, now
appearing as Section 40-7-2.2, Code of Alabama 1975 is amended
to read as follows:
"§40-7-2.2
(a) After each county-wide reappraisal, as provided by
Article 2, and the resulting assessed value of property for ad
valorem tax purposes, the tax assessor shall annually compare
the assessed value of each real property reappraised or
reassessed to the prior year's assessed value. If the assessed
Page 1

reassessed to the prior year's assessed value. If the assessed
HB167 INTRODUCED
value of the property increased, the tax assessor shall adjust
the assessed value of the property pursuant to this section.
(b)(1) The percentage increase in the assessed value of
Class III properties, as defined in Section 40-8-1, from the
previous year's assessed value, shall be limited to not more
than a seven percentthe percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all urban consumers as published by the U.S.
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics for the
immediately preceding year. increase in the assessed value of
the property from the previous year's assessed value.
(2) The percentage increase in the assessed value of
Class II properties, as defined in Section 40-8-1, from the
previous year's assessed value, shall be limited to not more
than a seven percent increasethe percentage increase in the
Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as published by
the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics for
the immediately preceding year. in the assessed value of the
property from the previous year's assessed value.
(c) The limitations provided for in subsection (b)
shall not apply to the following:
(1) Real property that has never been assessed.
(2) Additions or improvements to real property,
including new construction. This subdivision shall not include
repairs to or ordinary maintenance of an existing structure or
the grounds of the property.
(3) Change to the classification of the property.
(4) Change in ownership of the property, except for any
of the following:
Page 2

of the following:
HB167 INTRODUCED
a. Transfers between spouse or family members for no or
nominal consideration, including upon death of owner.
b. Transfers due to redemption after foreclosure of a
mortgage, tax sale, or tax lien.
(5) Property located in a tax increment district
created pursuant to Chapter 99 of Title 11.
(d) The limitations provided for in subsection (b)
shall be effective October 1, 2024, and shall continue through
the fiscal year beginning October 1, 2027.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026, and shall apply retroactively to October 1, 2024.
Page 3